Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20202-4108
Commission; officers; meetings; quorum.

At the first meeting of the commission, it shall elect a chairperson from among its members. The commission shall meet at least once every year and at such other times as called by the chairperson or by any three voting members of the commission. The majority of the voting members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for transaction of business. The commission may hold meetings by teleconference or videoconference subject to the Open Meetings Act. No member shall vote by proxy, and the affirmative vote of the majority of all members of the commission shall be necessary for the adoption of rules and regulations.

Laws 2020, LB803, § 8.
November 14, 2020
Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.